en: västerbotten cheese
da: västerbottensost
de: västerbotten-käse
es: queso västerbotten
fi: västerbotten-juusto
fr: västerbottensost
hr: västerbotten sir
id: keju västerbotten
it: formaggio Västerbotten
ja: ヴェステルボッテン・チーズ
la: caseus botniae occidentalis
ro: brânza västerbotten
sv: västerbottensost

en: Wensleydale, Wensleydale cheese
de: Wensleydale, Wensleydale-Käse
hr: wensleydale
it: wensleydale

en: american cheese
de: Scheiblettenkäse
es: queso americano
fr: Fromage à pâte fondue
hr: američki sir
it: formaggio americano

en: salt, table salt, common salt, cooking salt, dry salt, edible salt, edible common salt, food salt
af: tafelsout, Sout
an: Sal, sal de cocina
ar: ملح, ملح الطعام
av: ЦӀам
ay: Jayu
az: Duz, Xörək duzu
ba: Аш тоҙо
be: Павараная соль
bg: сол, трапезна сол, готварска сол
bn: লবণ
bo: ཚྭ།
br: Holen
bs: so, kuhinjska so
ca: sal, sal comuna, sal de cuina
cs: Sůl, jedlá sůl, jedlá sûl
cy: Halen
da: Husholdningssalt, køkkensalt, bordsalt, salt
de: Speisesalz, Kochsalz, Tafelsalz, Salz
el: Αλάτι, μαγειρικό αλάτι
eo: Salo, Komuna salo
es: Sal, sal común, sal de mesa, sales, sal de cocina, sal de grano
et: sool, söögisool, keedusool
eu: Gatz arrunt, mahaiko gatza
fa: نمک
fi: suola, ruokasuola, kuivasuola, suolaa
fr: sel, Sel alimentaire, sel de table, sel de cuisine, sel sec, sel comestible, gros sel
ga: Salann
gd: Salann
gl: Sal común
gn: Juky
gu: મીઠું
he: מלח, מלח שולחן, מלח לבישול, מלח יבש
hi: साधारण नमक
hr: sol, kuhinjska sol, jestiva sol
hu: só, étkezési só, konyhasó, asztali só
id: Garam dapur
ig: Ńnú
io: Manjebla salo
is: salt, borðsalt, matarsalt
it: sale, sale da cucina, sale alimentare
ja: 塩, 食塩
jv: Uyah
ka: სუფრის მარილი
kk: Ас тұзы
kn: ಉಪ್ಪು
ko: 소금
ku: Xwê
lt: druska, valgomoji druska, stalo druska
lv: Sāls, pārtikas-sāls
ml: ഉപ്പ്
mn: Хоолны давс
mr: मीठ
ms: Garam
my: ဆား
nb: salt
ne: नून
nl: zout, Keukenzout, bakkerszout, kookzout
no: salt
nv: Áshįįh
oc: Sal alimentària
or: ଲୁଣ
pa: ਲੂਣ
pl: sól, sól kuchenna, sól spożywcza, sól biała
ps: مالگه
pt: sal, sal de cozinha, sal de cosina, sal de taula
ro: sare, Sare de bucătărie, sare de masă
ru: соль, Поваренная соль, соль поваренная пищевая, соль пищевая, соль поваренная, соль пищевая, пищевая поваренная соль
rw: Umunyu
sa: लवणम्
sd: لوڻ
sh: So
si: ලුණු
sk: jedlá soľ
sl: sol, kuhinjska sol, jedilna sol, jedilna morska sol
sn: Munyu
so: Milix, Cusbo
sq: Kripa
sr: Со, so, kuhinjska so
su: Uyah
sv: salt, koksalt, bordssalt, bordssalt utan jod
ta: உப்பு
te: ఉప్పు
tg: Намак
th: เกลือ, เกลือแกง
tl: Asin
tr: tuz, Yemek tuzu
ug: تۇز
uk: сіль, кухонна сіль, сіль кухонна
ur: نمک
vi: Muối ăn
wa: Sé d' coujhene
xh: Ityiwa
yi: זאלץ
yo: Iyọ̀
zh: 盐, 食盐, 鹽, 食鹽

en: evaporated salt
da: sydesalt
de: Siedesalz

en: finegrained salt
ca: sal fina
de: feinkörniges Salz
es: sal fina
fi: hienojakoinen suola
fr: Sel fin
hr: fino zrnata sol
it: Sale fine
nl: Fijn zout
pt: Sal fino
ru: мелкая соль
zh: 细盐

en: medium-coarse salt
de: mittelgrobes Salz

en: coarse salt
sv: grovsalt

en: flake salt, salt flakes
de: Salzflocken, Salz-Flocken
eo: lamensalo
fr: flocon de sel
hr: pahuljice soli
it: fiocchi di sale
ko: 플레이크 소금
sv: flingsalt, saltflingor

en: salt from the Alps
de: Alpensalz

en: medium-coarse salt from the Alps
de: Mittelgrobes Alpensalz

en: rock salt
bg: каменна сол
de: Steinsalz
es: sal de roca
hr: kamena sol
hu: Kősó
it: sale grosso
lt: akmens druska
nl: steenzout, mineraalzout, dieetzout, zout dieetzout
pl: sól kamienna, naturalna sól kamienna

en: salt from Salies de Béarn
fr: sel de Salies de Béarn

en: salt from Kłodawa
pl: sól kłodawska, sól z Kłodawy, naturalna sól kamienna kłodawska

en: Smoked salt
bg: Пушена сол
ca: sal fumada
de: Rauchsalz, Hickorysalz, Smoked Salt
es: Sal ahumada
fi: savusuola
fr: Sel fumé
hr: dimljena sol
hu: Füst ízű só
it: sale affumicato
nl: Gerookt zout

en: black salt
bg: черна сол
de: schwarzes Salz, Schwarzsalz, Kala Namak
hr: crna sol
it: sale nero
nl: zwart zout
pl: czarna sól, czarnej soli, kala namak, sól czarna himalajska, czarna sól himalajska
ur: کالا نمک

en: Himalayan salt
bg: хималайска сол
ca: Sal de l'Himalaya
de: Himalayasalz
el: αλάτι Ιμαλάιων
es: Sal del Himalaya
fr: Sel de l'Himalaya
hr: himalajska sol
it: Sale dell'Himalaya
pl: Sól himalajska, soli himalajskiej
ro: sare himalayana, sare de himalaya
ru: гималайская соль
sr: хималajsка сол
tr: Himalaya tuzu

en: pink salt
bg: розова сол
ca: Sal rosa
de: Himmalaja-Salz
es: Sal rosa
fr: Sel rose
hr: ružičasta sol
it: Sale rosa
pl: sól różowa, soli różowej

en: Himalayan pink salt, Pink Himalayan salt
bg: Хималайска розова сол
ca: Sal rosa de l'Himalaya
de: rosa Himalayasalz, rosa Himalaya-Salz
es: Sal rosa del Himalaya
fi: kristallisuola, intiaanisuola, ruususuola, himalajan suola
fr: sel rose de l'Himalaya, sel de l'Himalaya rose
hr: himalajska ružičasta sol
it: Sale rosa dell'Himalaya

en: Himalayan sea salt
bg: Хималайска морска сол
ca: Sal de mar de l'Himalaya
de: Himalaya Meeressalz
es: Sal de mar del Himalaya
fr: Sel marin de l'Himalaya
hr: himalajska morska sol
hu: Himalája tengeri só
it: Sale marino dell'Himalaya
nl: Himalayazeezout
pl: Sól morska himalajska